Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1816
Act, how construed; assisted-living facilities or nursing facilities; provision of medical nutrition therapy.

(1) Nothing in the Medical Nutrition Therapy Practice Act shall be construed to permit a licensed dietitian nutritionist or a licensed nutritionist to practice any other profession regulated under the Uniform Credentialing Act.

(2) Nothing in the Medical Nutrition Therapy Practice Act shall require assisted-living facilities or nursing facilities to provide medical nutrition therapy, unless otherwise required by law, or employ or consult with licensed dietitian nutritionists or licensed nutritionists, so long as any medical nutrition therapy provided in such facilities is provided under an exemption listed under section 38-1812.

Laws 1988, LB 557, § 9;

Laws 1994, LB 853, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 29;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,293;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 638;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 51.